Utah statutes.
76-3-208.   Imprisonment -- Custodial authorities.
(1)  Persons sentenced to imprisonment shall be committed to the following
custodial authorities:
(a)  felony commitments shall be to the Utah State Prison;
(b) (i)  class A misdemeanor commitments shall be to the jail, or other
facility designated by the town, city, or county where the defendant was
convicted, unless the defendant consents to commitment to the Utah State
Prison for an indeterminate term not to exceed one year;
(ii)  if the defendant consents to commitment to the Utah State Prison for an
indeterminate term not to exceed one year, the court may impose the sentence.
The court may not order the imprisonment of a defendant to the Utah State
Prison for a fixed term or other term that is inconsistent with this section
and Section 77-18-4;
(c)   all other misdemeanor commitments shall be to the jail or other facility
designated by the town, city or county where the defendant was convicted.
(2)  Custodial authorities may place a prisoner in a facility other than the
one to which he was committed when:
(a)  it does not have space to accommodate him; or
(b)  the security of the institution or inmate requires it.
